Georgia statutes. TITLE 8 Buildings and Housing
PART 1 General Provisions

8-2-1.
Legislative findings and intent.

The General Assembly finds that an adequate supply of clean drinking water is a precious and essential resource upon which life depends.
The General Assembly further finds that the average annual per capita consumption of potable water due to indoor water-using activities in the United States exceeds 18,000 gallons and that the demand for clean water supplies continues to increase despite the limitations of availability and affordability of such supplies.
The General Assembly further finds that technology is available to improve the efficiency of plumbing products.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-2-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1212, § 1.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1990, p. 1212, § 1, designated the former provisions of this Code section as Code Section 8-2-3.

8-2-2.
Purpose of part.

The purposes of this part are as follows:

To promote greater efficiency in residential and commercial water use and preserve the natural resources of this state;

To reduce consumer water and energy costs by reducing indoor water use, reducing the need for new water supplies and treatment facilities, lowering operation and maintenance costs for water and sewer utilities, and reducing the amount of energy used to heat, treat, and transport water; and

To generate consumer awareness of the need to save water and of the savings that can result from the use of efficient plumbing products.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-2-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1212, § 1.

8-2-3.
Requirements for toilets, shower heads, faucets, and other high-efficiency plumbing fixtures.

On or before July 1, 2012, the department, with the approval of the board, shall amend applicable state minimum standard codes to require the installation of high-efficiency plumbing fixtures in all new construction permitted on or after July 1, 2012.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Construction” means the erection of a new building or the alteration of an existing building in connection with its repair or renovation or in connection with making an addition to an existing building and shall include the replacement of a malfunctioning, unserviceable, or obsolete faucet, showerhead, toilet, or urinal in an existing building.

“Department” means the Department of Community Affairs.

“Lavatory faucet” means a faucet that discharges into a lavatory basin in a domestic or commercial installation.

“Plumbing fixture” means a device that receives water, waste, or both and discharges the water, waste, or both into a drainage system. The term includes a kitchen sink, utility sink, lavatory, bidet, bathtub, shower, urinal, toilet, water closet, or drinking water fountain.

“Plumbing fixture fitting” means a device that controls and directs the flow of water. The term includes a sink faucet, lavatory faucet, showerhead, or bath filler.

“Pressurized flushing device” means a device that contains a valve that:

Is attached to a pressurized water supply pipe that is of sufficient size to deliver water at the necessary rate of flow to ensure flushing when the valve is open; and

Opens on actuation to allow water to flow into the fixture at a rate and in a quantity necessary for the operation of the fixture and gradually closes to avoid water hammer.

“Toilet” means a water closet.

“Water closet” means a fixture with a water-containing receptor that receives liquid and solid body waste and on actuation conveys the waste through an exposed integral trap into a drainage system and which is also referred to as a toilet.

“WaterSense™” means a voluntary program of the United States Environmental Protection Agency designed to identify and promote water efficient products and practices.

The standards related to high-efficiency plumbing fixtures shall include without limitation, the following:

A water closet or toilet that:

Is a dual flush water closet that meets the following standards:

The average flush volume of two reduced flushes and one full flush may not exceed 1.28 gallons;

The toilet meets the performance, testing, and labeling requirements prescribed by the following standards, as applicable:

American Society of Mechanical Engineers Standard A112.19.2-2008; and

American Society of Mechanical Engineers Standard A112.19.14-2006 “Six-Liter Water Closets Equipped with a Dual Flushing Device”; and

Is listed to the WaterSense™ Tank-Type High Efficiency Toilet Specification; or

Is a single flush water closet, including gravity, pressure assisted, and electro-hydraulic tank types, that meets the following standards:

The average flush volume may not exceed 1.28 gallons;

The toilet must meet the performance, testing, and labeling requirements prescribed by the American Society of Mechanical Engineers Standard A112.192/CSA B45.1 or A112.19.14; and

The toilet must be listed to the WaterSense™ Tank-Type High Efficiency Toilet Specification;

A shower head that allows a flow of no more than an average of 2.5 gallons of water per minute at 60 pounds per square inch of pressure;

A urinal and associated flush valve that:

Uses no more than 0.5 gallons of water per flush;

Meets the performance, testing, and labeling requirements prescribed by the American Society of Mechanical Engineers Standard A112.19.2/CSA B45.1;

For flushing urinals, meets all WaterSense™ specifications for flushing urinals; and

Where nonwater urinals are employed, complies with American Society of Mechanical Engineers Standard A112.19.3/CSA B45.4 or American Society of Mechanical Engineers Standard A112.19.19/CSA B45.4. Nonwater urinals shall be cleaned and maintained in accordance with the manufacturer’s instructions after installation. Where nonwater urinals are installed they shall have a water distribution line roughed-in to the urinal location at a minimum height of 56 inches (1,422 mm) to allow for the installation of an approved backflow prevention device in the event of a retrofit. Such water distribution lines shall be installed with shut-off valves located as close as possible to the distributing main to prevent the creation of dead ends. Where nonwater urinals are installed, a minimum of one water supplied fixture rated at a minimum of one water supply fixture unit shall be installed upstream on the same drain line to facilitate drain line flow and rinsing;

A lavatory faucet or lavatory replacement aerator that allows a flow of no more than 1.5 gallons of water per minute at a pressure of 60 pounds per square inch in accordance with American Society of Mechanical Engineers Standard A112.18.1/CSA B.125.1 and listed to the WaterSense™ High-Efficiency Lavatory Faucet Specification; and

A kitchen faucet or kitchen replacement aerator that allows a flow of no more than 2.0 gallons of water per minute.

To the extent that the standards set forth in this Code section exceed the National Energy Conservation Policy Act, as amended, and 10 C.F.R. 430.32, the department is directed to petition the Department of Energy for a waiver of federal preemption pursuant to 42 U.S.C. Section 6297(d).

The department is directed to amend the applicable state minimum codes so as to permit counties and municipalities to provide by ordinance for an exemption to the requirements of subsection (c) of this Code section, relative to new construction and to the repair or renovation of an existing building, under the following conditions:

When the repair or renovation of the existing building does not include the replacement of the plumbing or sewage system servicing toilets, faucets, or shower heads within such existing building;

When such plumbing or sewage system within such existing building, because of its capacity, design, or installation, would not function properly if the toilets, faucets, or shower heads required by this part were installed;

When such system is a well or gravity flow from a spring and is owned privately by an individual for use in such individual’s personal residence; or

When units to be installed are:

Specifically designed for use by persons with disabilities;

Specifically designed to withstand unusual abuse or installation in a penal institution; or

Toilets for juveniles.

The ordinances adopted by counties and municipalities pursuant to subsection (e) of this Code section shall provide procedures and requirements to apply for the exemption authorized by said subsection.

Any person who installs any toilet, faucet, urinal, or shower head in violation of this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

Before July 1, 2012, a city, county, or authority shall adopt and enforce the provisions of this Code section in order to be eligible to receive any of the following grants, loans, or permits:

A water or waste-water facilities grant administered by the Department of Natural Resources or the Department of Community Affairs; or

A water or waste-water facilities loan administered by the Georgia Environmental Finance Authority.

After July 1, 2012, the sale of a gravity tank-type, flushometer-valve, or flushometer-tank toilet that uses more than an average of 1.28 gallons of water per flush is prohibited in this state.

The provisions of this Code section shall not be construed to prohibit counties or municipalities from adopting and enforcing local ordinances which provide requirements which are more stringent than the requirements of this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1978, p. 914, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1979, p. 776, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1212, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 987, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1995, p. 1302, § 15; Ga. L. 2010, p. 732, § 8/SB 370; Ga. L. 2010, p. 949, § 1/HB 244.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 2010, the subsection (d) designation was added.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 732, § 1/SB 370, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “The General Assembly recognizes the imminent need to create a culture of water conservation in the State of Georgia. The General Assembly also recognizes the imminent need to plan for water supply enhancement during future extreme drought conditions and other water emergencies. In order to achieve these goals, the General Assembly directs the Georgia Department of Natural Resources to coordinate with its Environmental Protection Division, the Georgia Environmental Facilities Authority [now known as the Georgia Environmental Finance Authority], the Georgia Department of Community Affairs, the Georgia Forestry Commission, the Georgia Department of Community Health, including its Division of Public Health, the Georgia Department of Agriculture, and the Georgia Soil and Water Conservation Commission to work together as appropriate to develop programs for water conservation and water supply.”

8-2-4.
Fire sprinklers in single-family dwelling units.

Neither the state residential and fire building code nor any residential and fire building code adopted by a political subdivision of the state adopted after May 24, 2010, shall include a requirement that fire sprinklers be installed in a single-family dwelling or a residential building that contains no more than two dwelling units.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-2-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 450, § 1/HB 1196.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2010, “adopted after May 24, 2010,” was substituted for “adopted after the effective date of this Code section” near the middle of this Code section.